Mississippi, session 2026, SB2732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  Upon receiving a request from the bureau that a consumer reporting agency place a security freeze, any consumer reporting agency transacting business within this state shall, free of charge, place the security freeze in accordance with the procedure described in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i). (b)  For the purposes of this section, a consumer reporting agency transacting business within this state shall treat a request from the bureau as if the bureau was the consumer as contemplated in the procedure described in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i). (c)  A consumer reporting agency transacting business within this state shall remove a security freeze placed on the consumer report of a consumer only in accordance with the procedure described for such removal in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i) except that a consumer reporting agency transacting business within this state may remove a security freeze placed on the consumer report of a consumer that was placed due to a material misrepresentation of fact by the bureau. (2)  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context requires otherwise: (a)  "Bureau" means the Bureau of Vital Statistics established under Section 41-57-1. (b)  "Consumer reporting agency" shall have the meaning assigned in 15 USC § 1681a. (c)  "Security freeze" shall have the meaning assigned in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i)(1)(C). SECTION 2.  Section 41-57-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-57-7.  (1)  (a) The State Board of Health shall formulate and promulgate rules and regulations for the proper reporting and registration of morbidity and vital statistics, prescribing the method and form of making such registration. (b)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  (a)  The State Board of Health shall formulate and promulgate rules and regulations for parents in this state to authorize the bureau to request a security freeze under Section 1 of this act and the procedure described in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i) for a child within ten (10) days of the birth of the child. (b)  For a child who is born within a health care facility, the rules and regulations promulgated under this subsection shall provide for a form to be executed by a parent of the child authorizing the bureau to request a security freeze for the child. The form under this paragraph (b) shall be made available to parent of a child before the discharge of the child and execution of the form shall be at the discretion of the parent or parents of the child. (c)  For purposes of this subsection: (i)  The term "bureau" means the bureau of vital statistics established under Section 41-57-1. (ii)  The term "health care facility" shall have the meaning assigned in Section 41-7-173(h). (iii)  The term "security freeze" shall have the meaning assigned in 15 USC § 1681c-1(i)(1)(C). SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.